Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1224
Using explosives to kill or injure any person; penalty.

(1) Any person who uses explosive materials or destructive devices to intentionally kill, injure, or intimidate any individual commits the offense of using explosives to kill or injure any person.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, using explosives to kill or injure any person is a Class IIA felony.

(3) If personal injury results, using explosives to kill or injure any person is a Class II felony.

(4) If death results, using explosives to kill or injure any person shall be punished as for conviction of murder in the first degree.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 256;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 55.